Georgia, session 2025_26, HB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the State Court of Carroll County is hereby authorized to charge and collect
a technology fee to be set by the judge of the state court in an amount not to exceed $15.00
for the filing of each civil action with the court and not to exceed $15.00 as a surcharge upon
each fine assessed by the court. Such technology fees shall be used exclusively to provide
for technological needs of the State Court of Carroll County. Such uses shall include only
the following:
(1) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
H. B. 624
- 1 -

LC 44 2954/AP
(4) Procurement of services or equipment for the conversion of court records and
archives to digital content for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the state court, subject to audit by an auditor approved by the governing authority
of Carroll County, and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Carroll County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 624
- 2 -